District of Columbia statutes.
34-601

Schedules to conform to orders of Commission; schedule of changes to be approved by Commission.

All public utilities to which an order of the Commission applies shall make such changes in their schedules on file as may be necessary to make the same conform to said order, and no change shall thereafter be made by any public utility in any such rates, tolls, or charges, or in any joint rate or rates, without the approval of the Commission. Certified copies of all other orders of the Commission shall be delivered to the public utility affected thereby in like manner, and the same shall take effect within such reasonable time thereafter as the Commission shall prescribe.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 988, ch. 150, § 8, par. 61

History

Rate change procedures, appeal and review, see § 34-901.
Rates and charges, Commission’s power to regulate, see § 34-709.
Rate schedules, changes, see §§ 34-1123 et seq.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 43-901.
1973 Ed., § 43-701.

Prior Codifications